Illinois, session 104th, SB2026.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 29D-10 and 29D-15.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/29D-10)7    Sec. 29D-10. Definitions. As used in this Article, where 8not otherwise distinctly expressed or manifestly incompatible 9with the intent of this Article:10    (a) "Computer network" means a set of related, remotely 11connected devices and any communications facilities including 12more than one computer with the capability to transmit data 13among them through communication facilities.14    (b) "Computer" means a device that accepts, processes, 15stores, retrieves, or outputs data, and includes, but is not 16limited to, auxiliary storage and telecommunications devices.17    (c) "Computer program" means a series of coded instruction 18or statements in a form acceptable to a computer which causes 19the computer to process data and supply the results of data 20processing.21    (d) "Data" means representations of information, 22knowledge, facts, concepts or instructions, including program 23documentation, that are prepared in a formalized manner and   SB2026- 2 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1are stored or processed in or transmitted by a computer. Data 2may be in any form, including but not limited to magnetic or 3optical storage media, punch cards, or data stored internally 4in the memory of a computer.5    (e) "Biological products used in or in connection with 6agricultural production" includes, but is not limited to, 7seeds, plants, and DNA of plants or animals altered for use in 8crop or livestock breeding or production or which are sold, 9intended, designed, or produced for use in crop production or 10livestock breeding or production.11    (f) "Agricultural products" means crops and livestock.12    (g) "Agricultural production" means the breeding and 13growing of livestock and crops.14    (g-5) "Animal feed" means an article that is intended for 15use for food for animals other than humans and that is intended 16for use as a substantial source of nutrients in the diet of the 17animal, and is not limited to a mixture intended to be the sole 18ration of the animal.19    (g-10) "Contagious or infectious disease" means a specific 20disease designated by the Illinois Department of Agriculture 21as contagious or infectious under rules pertaining to the 22Illinois Diseased Animals Act.23    (g-15) "Processed food" means any food other than a raw 24agricultural commodity and includes any raw agricultural 25commodity that has been subject to processing, such as 26canning, cooking, freezing, dehydration, or milling.  SB2026- 3 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1    (g-20) "Raw agricultural commodity" means any food in its 2raw or natural state, including all fruits that are washed, 3colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form 4prior to marketing and honey that is in the comb or that is 5removed from the comb and in an unadulterated condition. 6    (g-25) "Endangering the food supply" means to knowingly:7        (1) bring into this State any domestic animal that is 8    affected with any contagious or infectious disease or any 9    animal that has been exposed to any contagious or 10    infectious disease;11        (2) expose any animal in this State to any contagious 12    or infectious disease;13        (3) deliver any poultry that is infected with any 14    contagious or infectious disease to any poultry producer 15    pursuant to a production contract;16        (4) except as permitted under the Insect Pest and 17    Plant Disease Act, bring or release into this State any 18    insect pest or expose any plant to an insect pest; or19        (5) expose any raw agricultural commodity, animal 20    feed, or processed food to any contaminant or contagious 21    or infectious disease.22    "Endangering the food supply" does not include bona fide 23experiments and actions related to those experiments carried 24on by commonly recognized research facilities or actions by 25agricultural producers and animal health professionals who may 26inadvertently contribute to the spread of detrimental   SB2026- 4 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1biological agents while employing generally acceptable 2management practices. 3    (g-30) "Endangering the water supply" means to knowingly 4contaminate a public or private water well or water reservoir 5or any water supply of a public utility or tamper with the 6production of bottled or packaged water or tamper with bottled 7or packaged water at a retail or wholesale mercantile 8establishment. "Endangering the water supply" does not include 9contamination of a public or private well or water reservoir 10or any water supply of a public utility that may occur 11inadvertently as part of the operation of a public utility or 12electrical generating station. 13    (h) "Livestock" means animals bred or raised for human 14consumption.15    (i) "Crops" means plants raised for: (1) human 16consumption, (2) fruits that are intended for human 17consumption, (3) consumption by livestock, and (4) fruits that 18are intended for consumption by livestock.19    (j) "Communications systems" means any works, property, or 20material of any radio, telegraph, telephone, microwave, or 21cable line, station, or system.22    (k) "Substantial damage" means monetary damage greater 23than $100,000.24    (l) "Terrorist act" or "act of terrorism" means: (1) any 25act that is intended to cause or create a risk and does cause 26or create a risk of death or great bodily harm to one or more   SB2026- 5 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1persons; (2) any act that disables or destroys the usefulness 2or operation of any communications system; (3) any act or any 3series of 2 or more acts committed in furtherance of a single 4intention, scheme, or design that disables or destroys the 5usefulness or operation of a computer network, computers, 6computer programs, or data used by any industry, by any class 7of business, or by 5 or more businesses or by the federal 8government, State government, any unit of local government, a 9public utility, a manufacturer of pharmaceuticals, a national 10defense contractor, or a manufacturer of chemical or 11biological products used in or in connection with agricultural 12production; (4) any act that disables or causes substantial 13damage to or destruction of any structure or facility used in 14or used in connection with ground, air, or water 15transportation; the production or distribution of electricity, 16gas, oil, or other fuel (except for acts that occur 17inadvertently and as the result of operation of the facility 18that produces or distributes electricity, gas, oil, or other 19fuel); the treatment of sewage or the treatment or 20distribution of water; or controlling the flow of any body of 21water; (5) any act that causes substantial damage to or 22destruction of livestock or to crops or a series of 2 or more 23acts committed in furtherance of a single intention, scheme, 24or design which, in the aggregate, causes substantial damage 25to or destruction of livestock or crops; (6) any act that 26causes substantial damage to or destruction of any hospital or   SB2026- 6 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1any building or facility used by the federal government, State 2government, any unit of local government or by a national 3defense contractor or by a public utility, a manufacturer of 4pharmaceuticals, a manufacturer of chemical or biological 5products used in or in connection with agricultural production 6or the storage or processing of agricultural products or the 7preparation of agricultural products for food or food products 8intended for resale or for feed for livestock; (7) any act that 9causes substantial damage to any building containing 5 or more 10businesses of any type or to any building in which 10 or more 11people reside; (8) endangering the food supply; or (9) 12endangering the water supply; or (10) any act that is intended 13to cause or create and does cause or create substantial damage 14to or destruction of any building or facility containing an 15entity providing reproductive health care as the term is 16defined in Section 1-10 of the Reproductive Health Act.17    (m) "Terrorist" and "terrorist organization" means any 18person who engages or is about to engage in a terrorist act 19with the intent to intimidate or coerce a significant portion 20of a civilian population.21    (n) "Material support or resources" means currency or 22other financial securities, financial services, lodging, 23training, safe houses, false documentation or identification, 24communications equipment, facilities, weapons, lethal 25substances, explosives, personnel, transportation, any other 26kind of physical assets or intangible property, and expert   SB2026- 7 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1services or expert assistance.2    (o) "Person" has the meaning given in Section 2-15 of this 3Code and, in addition to that meaning, includes, without 4limitation, any charitable organization, whether incorporated 5or unincorporated, any professional fund raiser, professional 6solicitor, limited liability company, association, joint stock 7company, association, trust, trustee, or any group of people 8formally or informally affiliated or associated for a common 9purpose, and any officer, director, partner, member, or agent 10of any person.11    (p) "Render criminal assistance" means to do any of the 12following with the intent to prevent, hinder, or delay the 13discovery or apprehension of, or the lodging of a criminal 14charge against, a person who he or she knows or believes has 15committed an offense under this Article or is being sought by 16law enforcement officials for the commission of an offense 17under this Article, or with the intent to assist a person in 18profiting or benefiting from the commission of an offense 19under this Article: 20        (1) harbor or conceal the person; 21        (2) warn the person of impending discovery or 22    apprehension; 23        (3) provide the person with money, transportation, a 24    weapon, a disguise, false identification documents, or any 25    other means of avoiding discovery or apprehension; 26        (4) prevent or obstruct, by means of force,   SB2026- 8 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1    intimidation, or deception, anyone from performing an act 2    that might aid in the discovery or apprehension of the 3    person or in the lodging of a criminal charge against the 4    person; 5        (5) suppress, by any act of concealment, alteration, 6    or destruction, any physical evidence that might aid in 7    the discovery or apprehension of the person or in the 8    lodging of a criminal charge against the person; 9        (6) aid the person to protect or expeditiously profit 10    from an advantage derived from the crime; or 11        (7) provide expert services or expert assistance to 12    the person. Providing expert services or expert assistance 13    shall not be construed to apply to: (1) a licensed 14    attorney who discusses with a client the legal 15    consequences of a proposed course of conduct or advises a 16    client of legal or constitutional rights and (2) a 17    licensed medical doctor who provides emergency medical 18    treatment to a person whom he or she believes has 19    committed an offense under this Article if, as soon as 20    reasonably practicable either before or after providing 21    such treatment, he or she notifies a law enforcement 22    agency.23(Source: P.A. 96-1028, eff. 1-1-11.) 24    (720 ILCS 5/29D-15.1)  (was 720 ILCS 5/20.5-5)25    Sec. 29D-15.1. Causing a catastrophe.   SB2026- 9 -LRB104 07100 RLC 17137 b1    (a) A person commits the offense of causing a catastrophe 2if he or she knowingly causes a catastrophe by explosion, 3fire, flood, collapse of a building, or release of poison, 4radioactive material, bacteria, virus, or other dangerous and 5difficult to confine force or substance.6    (b) As used in this Section, "catastrophe" means serious 7physical injury to 5 or more persons, substantial damage to 5 8or more buildings or inhabitable structures, or substantial 9damage to a vital public facility that seriously impairs its 10usefulness or operation; and "vital public facility" means a 11facility that is necessary to ensure or protect the public 12health, safety, or welfare, including, but not limited to, a 13hospital, a law enforcement agency, a fire department, a 14private or public utility company, a national defense 15contractor, a facility of the armed forces, or an emergency 16services agency, or an entity providing reproductive health 17care as the term is defined in Section 1-10 of the Reproductive 18Health Act.19    (c) Sentence. Causing a catastrophe is a Class X felony.20(Source: P.A. 96-710, eff. 1-1-10.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.